Utah statutes.
58-37-6.5.   Continuing professional education for controlled substance prescribers.

(1) (a)  Beginning on January 1, 2013, each individual, other than a veterinarian, who has a license to prescribe a controlled substance under Title 58, Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act, shall complete at least four continuing professional education hours in approved controlled substance prescribing classes per licensing period.

(b)  A controlled substance prescribing class under this section shall:

(i)  qualify for the American Medical Association Physician's Recognition Award Category 1 Credit;

(ii)  be presented by an organization accredited to provide continuing medical education by:

(A)  the Accreditation Council for Continuing Medical Education;

(B)  the Utah Medical Association; or

(C)  another recognized state continuing medical education accrediting body; and

(iii)  be approved by:

(A)  the recognized state continuing medical education accrediting body; and

(B)  the division.

(2)  The division, by rule and in consultation with the applicable practitioner licensing boards and the recognized state continuing medical education accrediting body, shall establish educational content for controlled substance prescribing classes under this section.  The content shall include materials such as:

(a)  use of the state controlled substance database;

(b)  specific pharmacology;

(c)  abuse, dependence, and addictive properties and toxicity of certain controlled substances, which may include opioid narcotics, hypnotic depressants, and psychostimulants; and

(d)  other applicable content as determined by the division and established by rule.

(3)  A controlled substance prescribing class required under this section:

(a)  may be held:

(i)  in conjunction with other continuing professional education programs; and

(ii)  online;

(b)  does not increase the total number of state-required continuing professional education hours required for prescriber licensing; and

(c)  shall be reported by an individual as part of the continuing professional education required for licensing.

(4)  As provided in Subsection 58-37f-402(8), completing the online tutorial and passing the online test described in Section 58-37f-402 shall count as 1/2 hour of continuing professional education under Subsection (1)(a).

(5)  The division may establish rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to implement this section.



Amended by Chapter 370, 2012 General Session

